Hawaii, session 2025, GM13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
PART II
SECTION 2. There is appropriated or authorized from the
source of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sum or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units
(2), (3), (4), (8), (9), (10), (13), and (14) and their excluded
counterparts. These amounts are in addition to the amounts
provided in Act 49, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024:
FY 2 0 2 4 -2 0 2 5
General funds $79,197,312

Page 2 H.B. NO. 1026
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
G.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 3. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 4. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units
(1) and (10) and their excluded counterparts. These are for
separate arbitration awards for the department of education, the
University of Hawaii and other state departments:
FY 2024-2025
General funds $112,893,712
Special funds 19,831,113
Federal funds 12,833,567
Other federal funds 590,263
Trust funds 68,778
Interdepartmental transfers 160,190
Revolving funds 593,939

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1026
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D.1
PROPOSED
SECTION 5. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 6. There is authorized from the source of funding
indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation - corporate
office (HTH 210) the following sum or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 the collective
bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the
exclusive representative of collective bargaining units (1) and
(10) who is assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation:
FY 2 0 2 4 -2 0 2 5
General funds $11,540,875
SECTION 7. Funds authorized by this part shall be allotted
by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART V
SECTION 8. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may

Page 4 1026
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2023-2025 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit
(11) and their excluded counterparts:
FY 2 0 2 4 -2 0 2 5
General funds $960,600
Special funds 5,140,600
SECTION 9. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART VI
SECTION 10. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds, provided that if the respective funds
are unable to support such payments, appropriations from other
means of financing may be used with the approval of the
Governor .

Page 5 H.B. NO. 1026
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 11. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall
lapse as of that date.
SECTION 12. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and
37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined
that at the beginning of the regular session of 2025, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 was
exceeded by $8,551,795, or one per cent. The appropriations
contained in Act 1, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, caused the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by an additional $30,334,159. Therefore, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 has
already been exceeded by $38,885,954, or one per cent.
The appropriations contained in this Act will cause the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by $204,592,499, or three per cent. This
declaration takes into account the additional general fund
appropriations authorized for fiscal year 2024-2025 in this Act
only. The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure
ceiling are that the appropriations made in this Act are

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1026
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
necessary to serve the public interest and to meet the needs
addressed by this Act.
SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

1026
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED